Nebraska, session 109, LB465.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB465 LB465
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 75-305, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-305 (1) Every regulated motor carrier subject to sections 75-301
to 75-322 other than transportation network companies shall pay an annual
fee not exceeding the sum of eighty dollars for each motor vehicle
operated, which fee shall be fixed by the commission and shall not exceed
the amount actually necessary to sustain the administration and
enforcement of such sections. When the applicant has registered his or
her motor vehicles under section 60-3,198, such fee shall be payable on
whichever shall be the lesser of (a) the proportion of his or her fleet
so registered or (b) the number of motor vehicles owned by him or her and
actually used in intrajurisdiction business within this state, except
that such annual fee for any truck-trailer or tractor-trailer combination
shall be one hundred twenty dollars. In the case of a truck-trailer or
tractor-trailer combination, only one license plate shall be required for
such combination.
(2) Every transportation network company shall pay an annual fee.
The company may choose to pay either an annual flat fee not to exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars or an annual per-vehicle fee not to exceed
eighty dollars for each personal vehicle operated by a driver of the
transportation network company. The commission shall establish the amount
of such annual fees per vehicle so that the amount collected does not
exceed the amount actually necessary to sustain the administration and
enforcement of laws, rules, and regulations governing transportation
network companies.
(3) Such annual fees shall be due and payable on or before January 1
and shall be delinquent on March 1 of each year after such permit or
certificate has been issued. If the initial certificate or permit is
issued to a motor carrier on or after July 1, the fee shall be fifty
percent of the annual fee. Such fees shall be paid to and collected by
the commission and remitted to the State Treasurer within thirty days of
-2-

LB465 LB465
2025 2025
receipt. The State Treasurer shall credit fees received pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section to the Transportation Network Company
Regulation Cash Fund for enforcement of laws, rules, and regulations
governing transportation network companies. The State Treasurer shall
credit fees received pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the
General Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 75-328, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-328 (1) In order to be used under sections 75-323 to 75-343, a
personal vehicle shall be in compliance with the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act as required for a passenger car as defined in section
60-345.
(2) A transportation network company or a certified mechanic shall
perform an initial safety inspection on each personal vehicle prior to
approving it for use as a personal vehicle. The inspection shall include
inspection of at least the following components and such components shall
be in good working order:
(a) Foot brakes;
(b) Parking or emergency brakes;
(c) Steering mechanism;
(d) Windshield;
(e) Rear window and other glass;
(f) Windshield wipers;
(g) Headlights;
(h) Taillights;
(i) Turn indicator lights;
(j) Stop lights;
(k) Front seat adjustment mechanism;
(l) The opening, closing, and locking capability of doors;
(m) Horn;
(n) Speedometer;
-3-

LB465 LB465
2025 2025
(o) Bumpers;
(p) Muffler and exhaust system;
(q) Tire conditions, including tread depth;
(r) Interior and exterior rear-view mirrors; and
(s) Safety belts for driver and passengers.
(3) Annually thereafter, a driver shall obtain such an inspection
and approval of the driver's personal vehicle in order to continue its
use as a personal vehicle. A driver shall maintain proof of the current
inspection.
(4) A transportation network company shall make the initial and
annual inspection reports available to the commission upon request.
Sec. 3. Original sections 75-305 and 75-328, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-